Utah statutes.
31A-2-306.5.   Stay of commissioner's decision pending administrative review or judicial appeal.

(1)  An order of the commissioner or a designee of the commissioner is not stayed by a petition for:

(a)  administrative review;

(b)  rehearing; or

(c)  judicial review.

(2)  A person seeking to stay an order of the commissioner or a designee of the commissioner shall seek a stay in accordance with:

(a)  rules made by the commissioner in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, pending a petition for:

(i)  administrative review; or

(ii) rehearing; or

(b)  Section 63G-4-405, pending judicial review.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

